Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 6.
Divorce, Affirmation and Annulment.

Research References.

- Friend's Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 28 Domestic Actions.
§
28.05 Suits for Divorce or for Affirmation or Annulment of Marriage. Friend

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender).
No. 5-101. Simple Divorce Checklist, et seq.

§ 20-89.

Repealed by Acts 1975, c. 644.

§ 20-89.1. Suit to annul marriage.

When a marriage is alleged to be void or voidable for any of the causes mentioned in § 20-13, 20-38.1, or 20-45.1 or by virtue of fraud or duress, either party may institute a suit for annulling the same; and upon proof of the nullity of the marriage, it shall be decreed void by a decree of annulment.

In the case of natural or incurable impotency of body existing at the time of entering into the marriage contract, or when, prior to the marriage, either party, without the knowledge of the other, had been convicted of a felony, or when, at the time of the marriage, either spouse, without the knowledge of the other spouse, was with child by a person other than the other spouse or had conceived a child born to a person other than the other spouse within 10 months after the date of the solemnization of the marriage, or where, prior to the marriage, either party had been, without the knowledge of the other, a prostitute, a decree of annulment may be entered upon proof, on complaint of the party aggrieved.

No annulment for a marriage alleged to be void or voidable under subsection B of § 20-45.1 or subsection B of this section or by virtue of fraud or duress shall be decreed if it appears that the party applying for such annulment has cohabited with the other after knowledge of the facts giving rise to what otherwise would have been grounds for annulment, and in no event shall any such decree be entered if the parties had been married for a period of two years prior to the institution of such suit for annulment.

A party who, at the time of such marriage as is mentioned in § 20-48, was capable of consenting with a party not so capable shall not be permitted to institute a suit for the purpose of annulling such marriage.

(1975, c. 644; 1976, c. 356; 2016, cc. 457, 543; 2020, c. 900.)

The 2016 amendments.

- The 2016 amendments by cc. 457 and 543 are identical, and substituted subsection A-D designations for (a)-(d) designations; in subsection A, inserted "or" preceding "20-45.1"; in subsection B, substituted "10" for "ten"; in subsection C, substituted "subsection B" for "subsection (b)" in two places; and, in subsection D, deleted "or
§
20-49" following "

§

20-48"; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 900 substituted "either spouse, without the knowledge of the other spouse, was with child by a person other than the other spouse or had conceived a child born to a person other than the other spouse" for "the wife, without the knowledge of the husband, was with child by some person other than the husband, or where the husband, without knowledge of the wife, had fathered a child born to a woman other than the wife" in subsection B.

Law review.

- For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1431 (1976). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

For an article, "Bargaining in the Shadow of the Market: Is There a Future for Egalitarian Marriage?" see 84 Va. L. Rev. 509 (1998).

Research References.

- Family Law Litigation Guide with Forms: Discovery, Evidence, Trial Practice (Matthew Bender).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 12B M.J. Marriage,

§§

13-15.

§ 20-90. Suit to affirm marriage.

When the validity of any marriage shall be denied or doubted by either of the parties, the other party may institute a suit for affirmance of the marriage, and upon due proof of the validity thereof, it shall be decreed to be valid, and such decree shall be conclusive upon all persons concerned.

Notwithstanding § 20-13, a marriage of a couple where one of the parties was under the age of 18 at the time of solemnization may be decreed valid upon petition by the party who was under the age of 18 at the time of the solemnization that would otherwise be deemed voidable under subsection C of § 20-45.1 solely because of age, once such party has attained the age of 18. If both parties were under the age of 18 at the time of solemnization, such petition shall not be granted unless both parties have reached the age of 18 and join in the petition together.

(Code 1919, § 5102; 2016, cc. 457, 543.)

The 2016 amendments.

- The 2016 amendments by cc. 457 and 543 are identical, and added subsection B.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 12B M.J. Marriage,
§
20.

§ 20-91. Grounds for divorce from bond of matrimony; contents of decree.

A divorce from the bond of matrimony may be decreed:

A decree of divorce shall include each party's social security number or other control number issued by the Department of Motor Vehicles pursuant to § 46.2-342.

For adultery; or for sodomy or buggery committed outside the marriage;

[Repealed.]

Where either of the parties subsequent to the marriage has been convicted of a felony, sentenced to confinement for more than one year and confined for such felony subsequent to such conviction, and cohabitation has not been resumed after knowledge of such confinement (in which case no pardon granted to the party so sentenced shall restore such party to his conjugal rights);

, (5) [Repealed.]

(6) Where either party has been guilty of cruelty, caused reasonable apprehension of bodily hurt, or willfully deserted or abandoned the other, such divorce may be decreed to the innocent party after a period of one year from the date of such act; or

(7), (8) [Repealed.]

(9) (a) On the application of either party if and when they have lived separate and apart without any cohabitation and without interruption for one year. In any case where the parties have entered into a separation agreement and there are no minor children either born of the parties, born of either party and adopted by the other or adopted by both parties, a divorce may be decreed on application if and when they have lived separately and apart without cohabitation and without interruption for six months. A plea of res adjudicata or of recrimination with respect to any other provision of this section shall not be a bar to either party obtaining a divorce on this ground; nor shall it be a bar that either party has been adjudged insane, either before or after such separation has commenced, but at the expiration of one year or six months, whichever is applicable, from the commencement of such separation, the grounds for divorce shall be deemed to be complete, and the committee of the insane defendant, if there be one, shall be made a party to the cause, or if there be no committee, then the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the insane defendant.

(b) This subdivision (9) shall apply whether the separation commenced prior to its enactment or shall commence thereafter. Where otherwise valid, any decree of divorce hereinbefore entered by any court having equity jurisdiction pursuant to this subdivision (9), not appealed to the Supreme Court of Virginia, is hereby declared valid according to the terms of said decree notwithstanding the insanity of a party thereto.

(c) A decree of divorce granted pursuant to this subdivision (9) shall in no way lessen any obligation any party may otherwise have to support the spouse unless such party shall prove that there exists in the favor of such party some other ground of divorce under this section or § 20-95.

(Code 1919, § 5103; 1926, p. 868; 1934, p. 20; 1952, c. 100; 1960, c. 108; 1962, c. 288; 1964, cc. 363, 648; 1970, c. 311; 1975, c. 644; 1982, c. 308; 1986, c. 397; 1988, c. 404; 1997, cc. 794, 898; 2020, cc. 270, 900.)

Cross references.

- As to authority of General Assembly to confer power on courts to grant divorce, see Va. Const., Art. IV,
§
14.

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendments by cc. 270 and 900 are identical, and in subdivision A (3), deleted "or her" following "his"; in sub-subdivision A (9) (a), substituted "they" for "the husband and wife," once each in the first and second sentences; and, in subsection B, deleted a comma after "social security number."

Law review.

- For discussion of divorce proceedings, see 46 Va. L. Rev. 1502 (1960). For discussion of constructive desertion as a ground for divorce in Virginia, see 47 Va. L. Rev. 362 (1961). For comment on divorce on ground of separation, see 18 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 157 (1961). For comment on desertion during pendency of divorce suit, see 18 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 245 (1961). For note on insanity as a defense on ground of divorce, see 18 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 321 (1961). For note on cohabitation during pendency of a divorce action, see 19 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 243 (1962). For comment, "Misconduct During an Interlocutory Divorce Period," see 20 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 335 (1963). For comment, "Recrimination and Comparative Rectitude," see 20 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 354 (1963). For article, "Divorce Without Fault Without Perjury," see 52 Va. L. Rev. 32 (1966). For article on insanity and divorce, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 12 (1970). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1411 (1970). For article, "Federal Taxation in Separation and Divorce," see 29 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 1 (1972). For article, "Sexual Relations After Separation or Divorce: The New Morality and the Old and New Divorce Laws," see 63 Va. L. Rev. 249 (1977). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981). For article on recent developments in Virginia domestic relations law, see 68 Va. L. Rev. 507 (1982). For article, "Is a Professional Degree Marital Property Under Virginia's Marriage Dissolution Statutes?," see 7 G.M.U. L. Rev. 47 (1984). For comment on child abuse and divorce under Virginia law, see 9 G.M.U. L. Rev. 55 (1986). As to interpretation of
§
20-91(9)(c) when dealing with recrimination, see 22 U. Rich. L. Rev. 565 (1988). For article, "The Subject Matter Jurisdiction of Virginia Courts in Divorce and Equitable Distribution Proceedings," see 11 G.M.U. L. Rev. 73 (1989).

For article, "Divorce Denied:
Have Mental Cruelty, Constructive Desertion and Reasonable Apprehension of Bodily Harm Been Abolished in Virginia?," see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (1991).

For an article relating to recent changes of formidable importance in major areas of domestic relations, both nationally and in Virginia, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1165 (1998).

For an article, "A Dead Language:
Divorce Law and Practice Before No-Fault," see 86 Va. L. Rev. 1497 (2000).

For 2007 annual survey article, "Family and Juvenile Law," see 42 U. Rich. L. Rev. 417 (2007).

For note, "Estop in the Name of Love: A Case for Constructive Marriage in Virginia," see 49 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 973 (2007).

For note, "Wrongs Committed During a Marriage: The Child that No Area of the Law Wants to Adopt," see 66 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 465 (2009).

For note, "Beyond the Bounds of Decency: Why Fault Continues to Matter to (Some) Wronged Spouses," see 66 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 503 (2009).

For note, "A Comment on Wrongs Committed during a Marriage: The Child that No Area of the Law Wants to Adopt," see 66 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 515 (2009).

Research References.

- Family Law and Practice (Matthew Bender). Rutkin.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Dismissal, Discontinuance and Nonsuit,
§
3; 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,

§§

4, 7, 13, 17, 23.1, 23.4, 23.5, 24, 26, 28, 32, 34, 47, 50, 60, 62, 63.

§ 20-92.

Repealed by Acts 1975, c. 644.

§ 20-93. Insanity of guilty party after commencement of desertion no defense.

When the suit is for divorce from the bond of matrimony for willful desertion or abandonment, it shall be no defense that the guilty party has, since the commencement of such desertion, and within one year thereafter, become and has been adjudged insane, but at the expiration of one year from the commencement of such desertion the ground for divorce shall be deemed to be complete, and the committee of the insane defendant, if there be one, shall be made a party to the cause, or if there be no committee, then the court shall appoint a guardian ad litem to represent the insane defendant. This section shall apply whether the desertion or abandonment commenced heretofore or shall commence hereafter.

(Code 1919, § 5103; 1926, p. 869; 1934, p. 20; 1954, c. 389; 1975, c. 644.)

Law review.

- For note on separation without fault and postnuptial insanity, see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 347 (1970).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
19, 28.

§ 20-94. Effect of cohabitation after knowledge of adultery, sodomy or buggery; lapse of five years.

When the suit is for divorce for adultery, sodomy, or buggery, the divorce shall not be granted, if it appear that the parties voluntarily cohabited after the knowledge of the fact of adultery, sodomy or buggery, or that it occurred more than five years before the institution of the suit, or that it was committed by the procurement or connivance of the party alleging such act.

(Code 1919, § 5110; 1975, c. 644.)

Law review.

- For note, "Estop in the Name of Love: A Case for Constructive Marriage in Virginia," see 49 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 973 (2007).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
25, 27, 34.

§ 20-95. Grounds for divorces from bed and board.

A divorce from bed and board may be decreed for cruelty, reasonable apprehension of bodily hurt, willful desertion or abandonment.

(Code 1919, § 5104; 1975, c. 644.)

Law review.

- For article, "Cruelty as a Ground for Divorce a Mensa et Thoro in Virginia," see 43 Va. L. Rev. 125 (1957). For note on cruelty and constructive desertion, see 45 Va. L. Rev. 1432 (1959). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1975-1976, see 62 Va. L. Rev. 1431 (1976). For article, "Sexual Relations After Separation or Divorce: The New Morality and the Old and New Divorce Laws," see 63 Va. L. Rev. 249 (1977). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1978-1979, see 66 Va. L. Rev. 281 (1980). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981). For article, "Is a Professional Degree Marital Property Under Virginia's Marriage Dissolution Statutes?," see 7 G.M.U. L. Rev. 47 (1984). For article, "The Subject Matter Jurisdiction of Virginia Courts in Divorce and Equitable Distribution Proceedings," see 11 G.M.U. L. Rev. 73 (1989).

For article, "Divorce Denied:
Have Mental Cruelty, Constructive Desertion and Reasonable Apprehension of Bodily Harm Been Abolished in Virginia?," see 25 U. Rich. L. Rev. 273 (1991).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
4, 13, 14, 17, 23, 50, 60.

§ 20-96. Jurisdiction of suits for annulment, affirmance or divorce.

The circuit court shall have jurisdiction of suits for annulling or affirming marriage and for divorces, and claims for separate maintenance, and such suits shall be heard by the judge as equitable claims.

(Code 1919, § 5105; 1922, p. 589; 1966, c. 449; 1975, c. 644; 1977, c. 624; 1979, c. 488; 1987, c. 171; 1989, c. 556; 2005, c. 681.)

Cross references.

- As to venue in suits for annulment, affirmance, or divorce, see subdivision 19 of

§

8.01-261.

Editor's note.

- Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, "only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth." The funding was not provided.

The 2005 amendments.

- The 2005 amendment by c. 681, effective January 1, 2006, deleted "on the chancery side" following "court" and inserted "and claims for separate maintenance, and such suits shall be heard by the judge as equitable claims."

Law review.

- For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981). For 1987 survey of Virginia civil procedure and practice, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 667 (1987). For 1987 survey of Virginia domestic relations law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 745 (1987). For article, "The Subject Matter Jurisdiction of Virginia Courts in Divorce and Equitable Distribution Proceedings," see 11 G.M.U. L. Rev. 73 (1989). For survey on civil procedure and practice in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 511 (1989). For survey on domestic relations in Virginia for 1989, see 23 U. Rich. L. Rev. 561 (1989).

For note, "Wrongs Committed During a Marriage: The Child that No Area of the Law Wants to Adopt," see 66 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 465 (2009).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
35, 36; 12B M.J. Marriage,

§§

13, 20.

§§ 20-96.1, 20-96.2.

Repealed by Acts 1999, c. 161.

§ 20-97. Domicile and residential requirements for suits for annulment, affirmance, or divorce.

No suit for annulling a marriage or for divorce shall be maintainable, unless one of the parties was at the time of the filing of the suit and had been for at least six months preceding the filing of the suit an actual bona fide resident and domiciliary of the Commonwealth, nor shall any suit for affirming a marriage be maintainable, unless one of the parties be domiciled in, and is and has been an actual bona fide resident of, the Commonwealth at the time of filing such suit.

For the purposes of this section only:

If a member of the Armed Forces of the United States has been stationed or resided in the Commonwealth and has lived for a period of six months or more in the Commonwealth next preceding the filing of the suit, then such person shall be presumed to be domiciled in and to have been a bona fide resident of the Commonwealth during such period of time.

Being stationed or residing in the Commonwealth includes, but is not limited to, a member of the armed forces being stationed or residing upon a ship having its home port in the Commonwealth or at an air, naval, or military base located within the Commonwealth over which the United States enjoys exclusive federal jurisdiction.

Any member of the Armed Forces of the United States or any civilian employee of the United States, including any foreign service officer, who (i) at the time the suit is filed is, or immediately preceding such suit was, stationed in any territory or foreign country and (ii) was domiciled in the Commonwealth for the six-month period immediately preceding his being stationed in such territory or country shall be deemed to have been domiciled in and to have been a bona fide resident of the Commonwealth during the six months preceding the filing of a suit for annulment or divorce.

Upon separation of a married couple, either spouse may establish his own and separate domicile, though the separation may have been caused under such circumstances as would entitle such spouse to a divorce or annulment.

(Code 1919, § 5105; 1922, p. 589; 1958, c. 169; 1968, c. 455; 1974, c. 278; 1978, c. 412; 1985, c. 304; 1987, c. 35; 1988, c. 448; 1991, c. 259; 2009, c. 582; 2015, c. 315; 2017, c. 480; 2020, c. 900.)

Cross references.

- As to venue in suits for annulment, affirmance, or divorce, see subdivision 19 of

§

8.01-261.

As to when personal jurisdiction over person may be exercised, see

§

8.01-328.1.

Editor's note.

- Clause 2 of Acts 1985, c. 304 provides that the provisions of the act shall not affect the validity of any divorce, annulment or affirmation decree rendered in the Commonwealth prior to July 1, 1985.

The 2009 amendments.

- The 2009 amendment by c. 582, in subdivision 3, in the introductory language, inserted "or any foreign service officer of the United States" and in clause (i), inserted "or immediately preceding such suit was."

The 2015 amendments.

- The 2015 amendment by c. 315 in the first paragraph, substituted "was at the time of the filing of the suit and had been for at least six months preceding the filing of the suit an actual bona fide resident and domiciliary of this Commonwealth" for "is and has been an actual bona fide resident and domiciliary of this Commonwealth for at least six months preceding the commencement of the suit" and "filing" for "bringing"; substituted "filing" for "commencement" or variants in subdivisions 1 and 3; and substituted "six-month" for "six month" in subdivision 3.

The 2017 amendments.

- The 2017 amendment by c. 480, in subdivision 3, substituted "civilian employee" for "foreign service officer" and inserted "including foreign service officer."

The 2020 amendments.

- The 2020 amendment by c. 900 substituted "the Commonwealth" for "this Commonwealth" wherever it appears in the introductory paragraph, in subdivision 1 and in subdivision 2 in the second and third instances; in subdivision 4, substituted "a married couple, either spouse may establish his" for "the husband and wife, the wife may establish her" and made stylistic changes.

Law review.

- For comment on the 1958 amendment to this section, see 44 Va. L. Rev. 1192 (1958). For note on jurisdiction to dissolve the marital status, see 48 Va. L. Rev. 992 (1962). For survey of the Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1967-1968, see 54 Va. L. Rev. 1215 (1968). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1973-1974, see 60 Va. L. Rev. 1529 (1974). For comment, "The Uniform Child Custody Jurisdiction Act in Virginia," see 14 U. Rich. L. Rev. 435 (1979).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 145 (2011).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 4A M.J. Conflict of Laws, Domicile and Residence,
§
16; 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,

§§

36, 38; 12B M.J. Marriage,

§

20.

§ 20-98.

Repealed by Acts 1977, c. 624.

Cross references.

- As to present provisions relating to venue in suits for annulment, affirmance, or divorce, see subdivision 19 of

§

8.01-261.

§ 20-99. How such suits instituted and conducted; costs.

Such suit shall be instituted and conducted as other suits in equity, except as otherwise provided in this section:

Except for a divorce granted on the grounds set forth in subdivision A (9) of § 20-91, no divorce, annulment, or affirmation of a marriage shall be granted on the uncorroborated testimony of the parties or either of them.

Whether the defendant answers or not, the cause shall be heard independently of the admissions of either party in the pleadings or otherwise.

Process or notice in such proceedings shall be served in the Commonwealth by any of the methods prescribed in § 8.01-296 by any person authorized to serve process under § 8.01-293. Service may be made on a nonresident by any of the methods prescribed in § 8.01-296 by any person authorized to serve process under § 8.01-320.

In cases where such suits have been commenced and an appearance has been made on behalf of the defendant by counsel, then notices to take depositions and of hearings, motions, and other proceedings except contempt proceedings, may be served by delivering or mailing a copy to counsel for opposing party, the foot of such notices bearing either acceptance of service or a certificate of counsel in compliance with the Rules of Supreme Court of Virginia. "Counsel for opposing party" shall include a pro se party who (i) has entered a general appearance in person or by filing a pleading or endorsing an order of withdrawal of that party's counsel or (ii) has signed a pleading in the case or who has notified the other parties and the clerk that he appears in the case.

In cases where such suits have been commenced, the defendant has been served pursuant to the provisions of subdivision 1 of § 8.01-296, and the defendant has failed to file an answer to the suit or otherwise appear within the time allowed by law, no further notice to take depositions or conduct an ore tenus hearing is required to be served on the defendant and the court may enter any order or final decree without further notice to the defendant.

Costs may be awarded to either party as equity and justice may require.

(Code 1919, § 5106; 1920, p. 503; 1928, p. 535; 1938, p. 202; 1968, c. 484; 1975, c. 644; 1977, c. 60; 1984, cc. 609, 616; 1987, c. 594; 1991, c. 244; 1992, c. 563; 2012, cc. 78, 84; 2013, cc. 81, 100; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 194.)

Cross references.

- As to service by publication, see

§

8.01-316 et seq.

As to competency of husband and wife to testify, see

§

8.01-398.

For rules of procedure in civil actions, generally, see Va. Sup. Ct. Rule 3:1 et seq.

Editor's note.

- Acts 1984, c. 609, cl. 2 and c. 616, cl. 2, provide: "That any annulment of a marriage or divorce granted prior to the effective date of this act which was commenced by service of process by any method of substituted service authorized by this act is hereby validated."

The 2012 amendments.

- The 2012 amendments by cc. 78 and 84 are identical, and deleted "the" preceding "Supreme Court of Virginia" in the first sentence of subdivision 4; added present subdivision 5; redesignated former subdivision 5 as subdivision 6 and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2013 amendments.

- The 2013 amendments by cc. 81 and 100 are identical, and inserted "or conduct an ore tenus hearing" near the end of subdivision 5, and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

- The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 194, effective July 1, 2021, inserted "Except for a divorce granted on the grounds set forth in subdivision A (9) of
§
20-91" at the beginning of subdivision 1 and made stylistic changes.

Law review.

- For comment on divorce on ground of separation, see 18 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 157 (1961). For comment, "Lack of Due Process in Virginia Contempt Proceeding for Failure to Comply with Order for Support and Alimony," see 4 U. Rich. L. Rev. 128 (1969). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1969-1970, see 56 Va. L. Rev. 1411 (1970). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1972-1973, see 59 Va. L. Rev. 1520 (1973). For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1732 (1975). For survey of Virginia law on evidence for the year 1974-1975, see 61 Va. L. Rev. 1752 (1975). For an overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981). For article, "The Role of Fault in Virginia Divorce Proceedings," see 20 U. Rich. L. Rev. 295 (1986).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 46 U. Rich. L. Rev. 145 (2011).

For annual survey article, "Family Law," see 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§§
11, 16, 23.4, 31, 32, 33, 34, 37, 39, 44, 82, 123.1; 7B M.J. Evidence,

§§

244, 254.

§ 20-99.1.

Repealed by Acts 1988, c. 583.

§ 20-99.1:1. How defendant may accept service; waive service.

A defendant in such suits may accept service of process by signing the proof of service before any officer authorized to administer oaths. This proof of service shall, when filed with the papers in the suit, have the same effect as if it had been served upon the defendant by a person authorized to serve process. In addition, service of process may be accepted or waived by any party, upon voluntary execution of a notarized writing specifying an intent to accept or waive any particular process, or by a defendant by filing an answer in the suit. Such notarized writing may be provided in the clerk's office of any circuit court and may be signed by such party to the proceedings before any clerk or deputy clerk of any circuit court, under oath, or may be drafted and filed by counsel or a pro se party in the proceeding, and shall, when filed with the papers in the suit, have the same effect as if the process specified had been personally served upon the defendant by a person authorized to serve process. For a suit for a no-fault divorce under subdivision A (9) of § 20-91, any such waiver may occur within a reasonable time prior to or after the suit is filed, provided that a copy of the complaint is attached to such waiver, or is otherwise provided to the defendant, and the final decree of divorce as proposed by the complainant is signed by the defendant. The court may enter any order or decree without further notice unless a defendant has filed an answer in the suit.

When service is accepted pursuant to this section by a nonresident person out of the Commonwealth, such service shall have the same effect as an order of publication duly executed.

Any process served outside the Commonwealth executed in such manner as provided for in this section is validated.

(1988, c. 583; 1989, c. 562; 1992, c. 563; 2019, cc. 133, 237.)

Editor's note.

- Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 1, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 3, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 929, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, "only if state funds are provided by the General Assembly sufficient to provide adequate resources, including all local costs, for the court to carry out the purposes of this act and to fulfill its mission to serve children and families of the Commonwealth." The funding was not provided.

The 2019 amendments.

- The 2019 amendments by cc. 133 and 237 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted "or a pro se party" in the fourth sentence and inserted the fifth sentence.

Law review.

- For 1987 survey of Virginia domestic relations law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 745 (1987).

For article, "Civil Practice and Procedure," see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 7 (2019).

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§
37; 14B M.J. Process,

§

56.

Research References.

- Bryson on Virginia Civil Procedure (Matthew Bender). Chapter 3 Active Jurisdiction.
§
3.01 Process. Bryson.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender).
No. 2-113 Acceptance/Waiver of Service of Process and Waiver of Future Service of Process and Notice.

§ 20-99.2. Service in divorce and annulment cases.

In any suit for divorce or annulment or affirmation of a marriage, process may be served in any manner authorized under § 8.01-296 or 8.01-320.

Any such process served prior to July 1, 1984, shall not be invalidated solely because service was made as prescribed under § 8.01-296.

(1984, c. 611; 2012, cc. 78, 84.)

The 2012 amendments.

- The 2012 amendments by cc. 78 and 84 are identical, and added "or 8.01-320" at the end of subsection A.

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§
37.

§ 20-100.

Repealed by Acts 1974, c. 123.

§ 20-101.

Repealed by Acts 1975, c. 644.

§ 20-102. When not necessary to allege or prove offer of reconciliation.

It shall not be necessary, in any suit for divorce from the bond of matrimony or from bed and board upon the ground of willful desertion or abandonment, to allege or prove an offer of reconciliation.

(1938, p. 382; Michie Code 1942, § 5106a; 1975, c. 644.)

Michie's Jurisprudence.

- For related discussion, see 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony,
§
21, 58.2.